test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-brii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - brī: # adjectives 16 'eng /est vaba/fin' - full paradigm
     brī+A+Sg+Nom: brī
     brī+A+Sg+Gen: brī
     brī+A+Sg+Par: brīõ
     brī+A+Sg+Dat: brīõn
     brī+A+Sg+Ins: brīõks
     brī+A+Sg+Ill: brīõ
     brī+A+Sg+Ela: brīõst
     brī+A+Pl+Nom: brīd
     brī+A+Pl+Gen: brīd
     brī+A+Pl+Par: brīḑi
     brī+A+Pl+Dat: brīdõn
     brī+A+Pl+Ins: brīdõks
     brī+A+Pl+Ill: brīži
     brī+A+Pl+Ela: brīšti
